District of Columbia statutes.
1-350.08

Reciprocal agreements.

The Central Collection Unit may enter into reciprocal agreements for the collection of delinquent debts with any state, local, or municipal government.

History

Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 1049, 59 DCR 8025